Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1003
Trustee; qualification.

(1) The trustee of a trust deed shall be:

(a) A member of the Nebraska State Bar Association or a licensed real estate broker of Nebraska;

(b) Any bank, building and loan association, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized to do business in Nebraska under the laws of Nebraska or the United States or an agency of the United States Department of Agriculture involved in lending;

(c) Any corporation authorized to conduct a trust business in Nebraska under the laws of Nebraska or the United States; or

(d) Any title insurer authorized to do business in Nebraska under the laws of Nebraska.

(2) The trustee of a trust deed shall not be the beneficiary named in the trust deed unless the beneficiary is qualified to be a trustee under subdivision (1)(b) or (c) of this section.

Laws 1965, c. 451, § 3, p. 1424;

Laws 1991, LB 235, § 58;

Laws 1992, LB 641, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 682, § 1.